Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2202.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) The state board of regents and each postsecondary
educational institution shall ensure that pre-service teachers in the fields
of early childhood, elementary, secondary and special education, are
equipped with essential knowledge and skills to support children affected
by fetal alcohol syndrome disorder, including, but not limited to:
(1) The common signs of and behaviors associated with fetal alcohol
syndrome disorders;
(2) the impacts of fetal alcohol syndrome disorders upon learning and
behavior; and
(3) techniques for communicating with a parent or guardian about a
suspected fetal alcohol syndrome disorder, educational intervention efforts
and whether an evaluation for special education and related services is
warranted.
(b) As used in this section:
(1) "Pre-service teacher" means an individual who is receiving the
education and training to become a licensed teacher but is not yet licensed.
(2) "Postsecondary educational institution" means any:
(A) State educational institution as defined in K.S.A. 76-711, and
amendments thereto;
(B) municipal university;
(C) community college; or
(D) not-for-profit institution of postsecondary education that has its
main campus or principal place of operation in Kansas, is operated
independently and not controlled or administered by a state agency or
subdivision of this state, maintains open enrollment and is accredited by a
nationally recognized accrediting agency for higher education in the
United States.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its

HB 2202 2
publication in the statute book.